District of Columbia statutes.
10-154

Connecting parkway to be part of park system.

When the lands authorized to be purchased pursuant to §§ 10-141 and 10-152, for a connecting parkway between Potomac Park, the Zoological Park, and Rock Creek Park, shall have been acquired, said lands shall be a part of the park system of the District of Columbia subject to the provisions of § 10-104.

July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 282, ch. 209
1981 Ed., § 8-154.
1973 Ed., § 8-160.
Acquisition of land authorized: Act of February 28, 1923, 42 Stat. 1366, ch. 148, provided authorization for the acquisition of certain land described in that Act.